Washington statutes.
RCW 43.79.425

Current state school fund—Abolished—Moneys transferred.

On and after June 12, 1980, the current state school fund is abolished and the state treasurer shall transfer any moneys in such account on such June 12, 1980, or any moneys thereafter received for such account, to the common school construction fund as referred to in RCW 28A.515.320.

[ 1990 c 33 s 581; 1980 c 6 s 6.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Statutory references—Severability—1990 c 33: See RCW 28A.900.100 through 28A.900.102.

Severability—1980 c 6: See note following RCW 28A.515.320.